local/incubator/apertium-sh-sl.sl.dix
    <!-- ADJ END-->
    <!--Pronouns -->
    <pardef n="jaz__prn">
      <!--p1-->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jaz</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mene</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>meni</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mene</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>meni</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mano</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>midva</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>midve</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>naju</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nama</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>naju</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>naju</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nama</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mi</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nas</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nam</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nas</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nas</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nami</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!--p2-->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tebe</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tebi</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tebe</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tebi</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tabo</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vidva</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vidve</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vaju</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vama</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vaju</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/>&gt;<s n="p2"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vaju</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vama</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vi</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vas</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vam</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vas</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vas</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vami</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!--p3-->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ona</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njega</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ga</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nje</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njemu</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mu</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njej</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ji</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njega</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ga</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nje</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njem</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njej</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njim</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njej</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onadva</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onidve</l>

    <e lm="personal pronouns"><i/><par n="jaz__prn"/></e>
